Washington statutes.
RCW 15.14.015

Rules—Scope.

The director may adopt rules necessary to carry out the purpose and provisions of this chapter concerning, but not limited to:

(1) Certification of planting stock as to freedom from infection by plant pests, variety, classification, and grade.

(2) Establishment of tolerances for planting stock that is diseased, infected with plant pests, defective, or off-type.

(3) Establishment of standards and grades for planting stock.

(4) Labeling, identification, grading, and packing of foundation, registered, and certified planting stock.

(5) Inspection and testing of foundation, registered, and certified planting stock prior to planting during the growing season or seasons, prior to and during harvest, and subsequent to harvest.

(6) Exclusion and removal of diseased, infected with plant pests, defective, or off-type plants from foundation, registered, and certified planting stock.

(7) Establishing processes, site requirements, and criteria for participation in programs authorized by this chapter.

(8) Cultivation and sanitation practices in growing, storing, distributing, and processing foundation, registered, and certified planting stock.

(9) Establishing recordkeeping requirements.

(10) Production, utilization, and testing of micropropagated plants for foundation, registered, and certified planting stock.

(11) Establishment of fees and assessments for inspection, testing, and certification of planting stock and other services authorized by this chapter.

[ 1999 c 144 s 2; 1961 c 83 s 3. Formerly RCW 15.14.030.]